Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.100

Chapter not applicable to certain employees of Cooperative Extension Service.

The provisions of this chapter shall not be applicable to any employee of the Washington State University Cooperative Extension Service who holds a federal civil service appointment and is thereby eligible for insurance coverage under the regulations of the United States Department of Agriculture and the United States Civil Service Commission, and which employee elects participation in the federal programs in lieu of the programs established pursuant to this chapter. Such election may be made only once.

[ 1979 ex.s. c 9 s 1.]